Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska2-10,114
Agents or employees; liability of principal.

In construing and enforcing the Plant Protection and Plant Pest Act, omission or failure of any individual acting for or employed by any other person or other principal within the scope of his or her employment or office shall in every case be deemed the act, omission, or failure of such person or other principal as well as that of the individual.

Laws 1988, LB 874, § 43.